Utah statutes.
59-13-315.   Transfer of ownership of vehicle -- Lien to be removed -- Tax
clearance by commission.
The transfer of registered ownership of any motor vehicle subject to a lien of
the tax imposed by this part may be effected only after a certificate of
clearance of the tax has been issued by the commission.
